matxin-fo-en.fo.dix
<dictionary>
  <!-- Contains foreign letters which appear in loanwords (W, Z, C, Q, X) -->
  <alphabet>AÁBDÐEFGHIÍJKLMNOÓPRSTUÚVYÝÆØWZCQXaábdðefghiíjklmnoóprstuúvyýæøwzcqx</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper name"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>

    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"    c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="supn"    c="Supine"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present tense (indicative)"/>
    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="part"    c="Infinitive marker ('particle')"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinate conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinate conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="al"      c="Altres"/>

    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pst"     c="Positive degree"/>
    <sdef n="comp"     c="Comparative degree"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative degree"/>

    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>

    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence marker"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- check? -->
    <pardef n="ei/tt__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>tt<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tv/ey__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eir</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eir</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ey</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ey</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eimum</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ggja</l>
          <r>ey<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tr/ý__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íggir</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íggir</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íggar</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íggar</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ý</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ý</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imum</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íggja</l>
          <r>ý<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fýra__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <!-- Interjections -->

    <pardef n="skál__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="við__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sum__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="ikki__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="frá"><i>frá</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="millum"><i>millum</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="íkring"><i>íkring</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aftan"><i>aftan</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="foruttan"><i>foruttan</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ígjørgnum"><i>ígjørgnum</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="umframt"><i>umframt</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hvørgumegin"><i>hvørgumegin</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="somumegin"><i>somumegin</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nær"><i>nær</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="undan"><i>undan</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="og"><i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="enn"><i>enn</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ella"><i>ella</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="men"><i>men</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tí"><i>tí</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bæði"><i>bæði</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="hvørki"><i>hvørki</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="annaðhvørt"><i>annaðhvørt</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="meðan"><i>meðan</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="meðan"><i>meðan</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="síðan"><i>síðan</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="tó at"><i>tó<b/>at</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="tí at"><i>tí<b/>at</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="har sum"><i>har<b/>sum</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="til tess at"><i>til<b/>tess<b/>at</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="so sum"><i>so<b/>sum</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="tað sama sum"><i>tað<b/>sama<b/>sum</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrr enn"><i>fyrr<b/>enn</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="eitt"><i>ei</i><par n="ei/tt__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tvey"><i>tv</i><par n="tv/ey__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trý"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/ý__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seks"><i>seks</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="átta"><i>átta</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tíggju"><i>tíggju</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tólv"><i>tólv</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjúrtan"><i>fjúrtan</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sekstan"><i>sekstan</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="átjan"><i>átjan</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tjúgu"><i>tjúgu</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjøruti"><i>fjøruti</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trýss"><i>trýss</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fýrs"><i>fýrs</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hundrað"><i>hundrað</i><par n="fýra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ofta"><i>ofta</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fram"><i>fram</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="uttan"><i>uttan</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ikki"><i>ikki</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aldri"><i>aldri</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aftur"><i>aftur</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bert"><i>bert</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="burtur"><i>burtur</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="skjótt"><i>skjótt</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tó"><i>tó</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="úr"><i>úr</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="soleiðis"><i>soleiðis</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ája"><i>ája</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ájú"><i>ájú</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="buldó"><i>buldó</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dekan"><i>dekan</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="eya"><i>eya</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="meg"><i>meg</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hey"><i>hey</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="illanstíð"><i>illanstíð</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jú"><i>jú</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ólukkutíð"><i>ólukkutíð</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tramanstíð"><i>tramanstíð</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="uff"><i>uff</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- End of sentence -->
    </e>
